Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5767.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 40. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, in addition to the
requirements in sections 37 and 39, all participants in a driver
education course must complete a work zone safety education course
that is approved by the department of state and meets the following
requirements:
(a) The department of state has consulted with the state
transportation department about the content of the work zone safety
education course.
(b) The work zone safety education course consists of not less
SCI H06076'26 (H-2) torzuy


than 30 minutes of education delivered through either of the
following formats:
(i) An online format approved by the department of state.
(ii) In-person instruction as part of a driver education course
under this act.
(c) The work zone safety education course must include, but is
not limited to, the following topics:
(i) Instruction on identifying and navigating highway
construction and maintenance zones.
(ii) Education on the safety precautions necessary to protect
both drivers and workers in work zones.
(iii) Information on the legal requirements and penalties
associated with traffic violations in work zones.
(iv) Strategies for safe driving behavior in the presence of
construction equipment and personnel.
(2) Successful completion of the work zone safety education
course described in subsection (1) must be documented and submitted
to the department of state, in a form and manner as prescribed by
the department of state, prior to the issuance of the applicant's
level 2 graduated driver license.
(3) The department of state shall adopt a standardized
curriculum for the work zone safety education course and ensure it
is consistent across all delivery methods. The department of state
may approve and utilize existing driver education curriculum
materials, including, but not limited to, AAA driver education
curriculum, if the curriculum is determined appropriate by the
department and meets the requirements of this section.
(4) The department of state may collaborate with the state
transportation department, law enforcement agencies, and other
SCI H06076'26 (H-2) torzuy


stakeholders to update and enhance the course content regularly.
(5) The work zone safety education course must be provided to
participants in a driver education course at no additional cost to
the participant.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5768 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
SCI H06076'26 (H-2) torzuy